District of Columbia statutes.
15-311

Property subject to levy.

The writ of fieri facias may be levied on all goods and chattels of the debtor not exempt from execution, and upon money, bills, checks, promissory notes, or bonds, or certificates of stock in corporations owned by the debtor, and upon his money in the hands of the marshal or his deputy or other officer or person charged with the execution of the writ. A writ of fieri facias issued from the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon a judgment entered in such court may be levied on all legal leasehold and freehold estates of the debtor in land, but only after such judgment has been filed and recorded in the office of the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 264, Pub. L. 89-493, § 12
Nov. 2, 1966, 80 Stat. 1178, Pub. L. 89-745,§ 5
Mar. 11, 1968, 82 Stat. 42, Pub. L. 90-263, § 3
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(7)

Cross References

Disability insurance benefits, exemption from execution, see § 31-4716.01.
Exemptions from executions generally, see § 15-101 et seq.
Fraternal benefit association benefits, exemption from execution, see § 31-5711.
Group life policies and proceeds exemption from execution, see § 31-4717.
Notary’s official seal and documents, exemption from execution, see § 1-1206.
Public assistance exemption from assignment or execution, see § 4-217.01.
Seizure by execution of goods located on leased premises, payment of rent due as prerequisite, see § 42-3216.
Teacher retirement annuities, exemption from assignment or execution, see § 38-2001.17.
Unemployment compensation benefits, partial exemption from execution, see § 51-118.
Wrongful death damages, exemption from appropriation for payment of debts and liabilities, see § 16-2703.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-311.
1973 Ed., § 15-311.